Illinois, session 104th, HB74.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Unified Code of Corrections is amended by 5changing Section 5-5-3 as follows: 6    (730 ILCS 5/5-5-3)7    (Text of Section before amendment by P.A. 103-825)8    Sec. 5-5-3. Disposition. 9    (a) (Blank).10    (b) (Blank). 11    (c)(1) (Blank).12    (2) A period of probation, a term of periodic imprisonment 13or conditional discharge shall not be imposed for the 14following offenses. The court shall sentence the offender to 15not less than the minimum term of imprisonment set forth in 16this Code for the following offenses, and may order a fine or 17restitution or both in conjunction with such term of 18imprisonment:19        (A) First degree murder.20        (B) Attempted first degree murder.21        (C) A Class X felony.22        (D) A violation of Section 401.1 or 407 of the 23    Illinois Controlled Substances Act, or a violation of   HB0074- 2 -LRB104 03324 RLC 13346 b1    subdivision (c)(1.5) of Section 401 of that Act which 2    relates to more than 5 grams of a substance containing 3    fentanyl or an analog thereof.4        (D-5) A violation of subdivision (c)(1) of Section 401 5    of the Illinois Controlled Substances Act which relates to 6    3 or more grams of a substance containing heroin or an 7    analog thereof. 8        (E) (Blank).9        (F) A Class 1 or greater felony if the offender had 10    been convicted of a Class 1 or greater felony, including 11    any state or federal conviction for an offense that 12    contained, at the time it was committed, the same elements 13    as an offense now (the date of the offense committed after 14    the prior Class 1 or greater felony) classified as a Class 15    1 or greater felony, within 10 years of the date on which 16    the offender committed the offense for which he or she is 17    being sentenced, except as otherwise provided in Section 18    40-10 of the Substance Use Disorder Act.19        (F-3) A Class 2 or greater felony sex offense or 20    felony firearm offense if the offender had been convicted 21    of a Class 2 or greater felony, including any state or 22    federal conviction for an offense that contained, at the 23    time it was committed, the same elements as an offense now 24    (the date of the offense committed after the prior Class 2 25    or greater felony) classified as a Class 2 or greater 26    felony, within 10 years of the date on which the offender   HB0074- 3 -LRB104 03324 RLC 13346 b1    committed the offense for which he or she is being 2    sentenced, except as otherwise provided in Section 40-10 3    of the Substance Use Disorder Act. 4        (F-5) A violation of Section 24-1, 24-1.1, or 24-1.6 5    of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012 6    for which imprisonment is prescribed in those Sections.7        (G) Residential burglary, except as otherwise provided 8    in Section 40-10 of the Substance Use Disorder Act.9        (H) Criminal sexual assault.10        (I) Aggravated battery of a senior citizen as 11    described in Section 12-4.6 or subdivision (a)(4) of 12    Section 12-3.05 of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the 13    Criminal Code of 2012.14        (J) A forcible felony if the offense was related to 15    the activities of an organized gang.16        Before July 1, 1994, for the purposes of this 17    paragraph, "organized gang" means an association of 5 or 18    more persons, with an established hierarchy, that 19    encourages members of the association to perpetrate crimes 20    or provides support to the members of the association who 21    do commit crimes.22        Beginning July 1, 1994, for the purposes of this 23    paragraph, "organized gang" has the meaning ascribed to it 24    in Section 10 of the Illinois Streetgang Terrorism Omnibus 25    Prevention Act.26        (K) Vehicular hijacking.  HB0074- 4 -LRB104 03324 RLC 13346 b1        (L) A second or subsequent conviction for the offense 2    of hate crime when the underlying offense upon which the 3    hate crime is based is felony aggravated assault or felony 4    mob action.5        (M) A second or subsequent conviction for the offense 6    of institutional vandalism if the damage to the property 7    exceeds $300.8        (N) A Class 3 felony violation of paragraph (1) of 9    subsection (a) of Section 2 of the Firearm Owners 10    Identification Card Act.11        (O) A violation of Section 12-6.1 or 12-6.5 of the 12    Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012.13        (P) A violation of paragraph (1), (2), (3), (4), (5), 14    or (7) of subsection (a) of Section 11-20.1 of the 15    Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012.16        (P-5) A violation of paragraph (6) of subsection (a) 17    of Section 11-20.1 of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the 18    Criminal Code of 2012 if the victim is a household or 19    family member of the defendant.20        (Q) A violation of subsection (b) or (b-5) of Section 21    20-1, Section 20-1.2, or Section 20-1.3 of the Criminal 22    Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012.23        (R) A violation of Section 24-3A of the Criminal Code 24    of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012.25        (S) (Blank).26        (T) (Blank).  HB0074- 5 -LRB104 03324 RLC 13346 b1        (U) A second or subsequent violation of Section 6-303 2    of the Illinois Vehicle Code committed while his or her 3    driver's license, permit, or privilege was revoked because 4    of a violation of Section 9-3 of the Criminal Code of 1961 5    or the Criminal Code of 2012, relating to the offense of 6    reckless homicide, or a similar provision of a law of 7    another state. 8        (V) A violation of paragraph (4) of subsection (c) of 9    Section 11-20.1B or paragraph (4) of subsection (c) of 10    Section 11-20.3 of the Criminal Code of 1961, or paragraph 11    (6) of subsection (a) of Section 11-20.1 of the Criminal 12    Code of 2012 when the victim is under 13 years of age and 13    the defendant has previously been convicted under the laws 14    of this State or any other state of the offense of child 15    pornography, aggravated child pornography, aggravated 16    criminal sexual abuse, aggravated criminal sexual assault, 17    predatory criminal sexual assault of a child, or any of 18    the offenses formerly known as rape, deviate sexual 19    assault, indecent liberties with a child, or aggravated 20    indecent liberties with a child where the victim was under 21    the age of 18 years or an offense that is substantially 22    equivalent to those offenses.23        (W) A violation of Section 24-3.5 of the Criminal Code 24    of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012. 25        (X) A violation of subsection (a) of Section 31-1a of 26    the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012.  HB0074- 6 -LRB104 03324 RLC 13346 b1        (Y) A conviction for unlawful possession of a firearm 2    by a street gang member when the firearm was loaded or 3    contained firearm ammunition. 4        (Z) A Class 1 felony committed while he or she was 5    serving a term of probation or conditional discharge for a 6    felony.7        (AA) Theft of property exceeding $500,000 and not 8    exceeding $1,000,000 in value.9        (BB) Laundering of criminally derived property of a 10    value exceeding $500,000.11        (CC) Knowingly selling, offering for sale, holding for 12    sale, or using 2,000 or more counterfeit items or 13    counterfeit items having a retail value in the aggregate 14    of $500,000 or more. 15        (DD) A conviction for aggravated assault under 16    paragraph (6) of subsection (c) of Section 12-2 of the 17    Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012 if the 18    firearm is aimed toward the person against whom the 19    firearm is being used. 20        (EE) A conviction for a violation of paragraph (2) of 21    subsection (a) of Section 24-3B of the Criminal Code of 22    2012. 23    (3) (Blank).24    (4) A minimum term of imprisonment of not less than 10 25consecutive days or 30 days of community service shall be 26imposed for a violation of paragraph (c) of Section 6-303 of   HB0074- 7 -LRB104 03324 RLC 13346 b1the Illinois Vehicle Code.2    (4.1) (Blank).3    (4.2) Except as provided in paragraphs (4.3) and (4.8) of 4this subsection (c), a minimum of 100 hours of community 5service shall be imposed for a second violation of Section 66-303 of the Illinois Vehicle Code.7    (4.3) A minimum term of imprisonment of 30 days or 300 8hours of community service, as determined by the court, shall 9be imposed for a second violation of subsection (c) of Section 106-303 of the Illinois Vehicle Code.11    (4.4) Except as provided in paragraphs (4.5), (4.6), and 12(4.9) of this subsection (c), a minimum term of imprisonment 13of 30 days or 300 hours of community service, as determined by 14the court, shall be imposed for a third or subsequent 15violation of Section 6-303 of the Illinois Vehicle Code. The 16court may give credit toward the fulfillment of community 17service hours for participation in activities and treatment as 18determined by court services. 19    (4.5) A minimum term of imprisonment of 30 days shall be 20imposed for a third violation of subsection (c) of Section 216-303 of the Illinois Vehicle Code.22    (4.6) Except as provided in paragraph (4.10) of this 23subsection (c), a minimum term of imprisonment of 180 days 24shall be imposed for a fourth or subsequent violation of 25subsection (c) of Section 6-303 of the Illinois Vehicle Code.26    (4.7) A minimum term of imprisonment of not less than 30   HB0074- 8 -LRB104 03324 RLC 13346 b1consecutive days, or 300 hours of community service, shall be 2imposed for a violation of subsection (a-5) of Section 6-303 3of the Illinois Vehicle Code, as provided in subsection (b-5) 4of that Section. 5    (4.8) A mandatory prison sentence shall be imposed for a 6second violation of subsection (a-5) of Section 6-303 of the 7Illinois Vehicle Code, as provided in subsection (c-5) of that 8Section. The person's driving privileges shall be revoked for 9a period of not less than 5 years from the date of his or her 10release from prison. 11    (4.9) A mandatory prison sentence of not less than 4 and 12not more than 15 years shall be imposed for a third violation 13of subsection (a-5) of Section 6-303 of the Illinois Vehicle 14Code, as provided in subsection (d-2.5) of that Section. The 15person's driving privileges shall be revoked for the remainder 16of his or her life. 17    (4.10) A mandatory prison sentence for a Class 1 felony 18shall be imposed, and the person shall be eligible for an 19extended term sentence, for a fourth or subsequent violation 20of subsection (a-5) of Section 6-303 of the Illinois Vehicle 21Code, as provided in subsection (d-3.5) of that Section. The 22person's driving privileges shall be revoked for the remainder 23of his or her life. 24    (5) The court may sentence a corporation or unincorporated 25association convicted of any offense to:26        (A) a period of conditional discharge;  HB0074- 9 -LRB104 03324 RLC 13346 b1        (B) a fine;2        (C) make restitution to the victim under Section 5-5-6 3    of this Code.4    (5.1) In addition to any other penalties imposed, and 5except as provided in paragraph (5.2) or (5.3), a person 6convicted of violating subsection (c) of Section 11-907 of the 7Illinois Vehicle Code shall have his or her driver's license, 8permit, or privileges suspended for at least 90 days but not 9more than one year, if the violation resulted in damage to the 10property of another person.11    (5.2) In addition to any other penalties imposed, and 12except as provided in paragraph (5.3), a person convicted of 13violating subsection (c) of Section 11-907 of the Illinois 14Vehicle Code shall have his or her driver's license, permit, 15or privileges suspended for at least 180 days but not more than 162 years, if the violation resulted in injury to another 17person.18    (5.3) In addition to any other penalties imposed, a person 19convicted of violating subsection (c) of Section 11-907 of the 20Illinois Vehicle Code shall have his or her driver's license, 21permit, or privileges suspended for 2 years, if the violation 22resulted in the death of another person.23    (5.4) In addition to any other penalties imposed, a person 24convicted of violating Section 3-707 of the Illinois Vehicle 25Code shall have his or her driver's license, permit, or 26privileges suspended for 3 months and until he or she has paid   HB0074- 10 -LRB104 03324 RLC 13346 b1a reinstatement fee of $100.2    (5.5) In addition to any other penalties imposed, a person 3convicted of violating Section 3-707 of the Illinois Vehicle 4Code during a period in which his or her driver's license, 5permit, or privileges were suspended for a previous violation 6of that Section shall have his or her driver's license, 7permit, or privileges suspended for an additional 6 months 8after the expiration of the original 3-month suspension and 9until he or she has paid a reinstatement fee of $100. 10    (6) (Blank).11    (7) (Blank).12    (8) (Blank).13    (9) A defendant convicted of a second or subsequent 14offense of ritualized abuse of a child may be sentenced to a 15term of natural life imprisonment.16    (10) (Blank).17    (11) The court shall impose a minimum fine of $1,000 for a 18first offense and $2,000 for a second or subsequent offense 19upon a person convicted of or placed on supervision for 20battery when the individual harmed was a sports official or 21coach at any level of competition and the act causing harm to 22the sports official or coach occurred within an athletic 23facility or within the immediate vicinity of the athletic 24facility at which the sports official or coach was an active 25participant of the athletic contest held at the athletic 26facility. For the purposes of this paragraph (11), "sports   HB0074- 11 -LRB104 03324 RLC 13346 b1official" means a person at an athletic contest who enforces 2the rules of the contest, such as an umpire or referee; 3"athletic facility" means an indoor or outdoor playing field 4or recreational area where sports activities are conducted; 5and "coach" means a person recognized as a coach by the 6sanctioning authority that conducted the sporting event.7    (12) A person may not receive a disposition of court 8supervision for a violation of Section 5-16 of the Boat 9Registration and Safety Act if that person has previously 10received a disposition of court supervision for a violation of 11that Section. 12    (13) A person convicted of or placed on court supervision 13for an assault or aggravated assault when the victim and the 14offender are family or household members as defined in Section 15103 of the Illinois Domestic Violence Act of 1986 or convicted 16of domestic battery or aggravated domestic battery may be 17required to attend a Partner Abuse Intervention Program under 18protocols set forth by the Illinois Department of Human 19Services under such terms and conditions imposed by the court. 20The costs of such classes shall be paid by the offender. 21    (d) In any case in which a sentence originally imposed is 22vacated, the case shall be remanded to the trial court. The 23trial court shall hold a hearing under Section 5-4-1 of this 24Code which may include evidence of the defendant's life, moral 25character and occupation during the time since the original 26sentence was passed. The trial court shall then impose   HB0074- 12 -LRB104 03324 RLC 13346 b1sentence upon the defendant. The trial court may impose any 2sentence which could have been imposed at the original trial 3subject to Section 5-5-4 of this Code. If a sentence is vacated 4on appeal or on collateral attack due to the failure of the 5trier of fact at trial to determine beyond a reasonable doubt 6the existence of a fact (other than a prior conviction) 7necessary to increase the punishment for the offense beyond 8the statutory maximum otherwise applicable, either the 9defendant may be re-sentenced to a term within the range 10otherwise provided or, if the State files notice of its 11intention to again seek the extended sentence, the defendant 12shall be afforded a new trial.13    (e) In cases where prosecution for aggravated criminal 14sexual abuse under Section 11-1.60 or 12-16 of the Criminal 15Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012 results in conviction 16of a defendant who was a family member of the victim at the 17time of the commission of the offense, the court shall 18consider the safety and welfare of the victim and may impose a 19sentence of probation only where:20        (1) the court finds (A) or (B) or both are 21    appropriate:22            (A) the defendant is willing to undergo a court 23        approved counseling program for a minimum duration of 24        2 years; or25            (B) the defendant is willing to participate in a 26        court approved plan, including, but not limited to,   HB0074- 13 -LRB104 03324 RLC 13346 b1        the defendant's:2                (i) removal from the household;3                (ii) restricted contact with the victim;4                (iii) continued financial support of the 5            family;6                (iv) restitution for harm done to the victim; 7            and8                (v) compliance with any other measures that 9            the court may deem appropriate; and10        (2) the court orders the defendant to pay for the 11    victim's counseling services, to the extent that the court 12    finds, after considering the defendant's income and 13    assets, that the defendant is financially capable of 14    paying for such services, if the victim was under 18 years 15    of age at the time the offense was committed and requires 16    counseling as a result of the offense.17    Probation may be revoked or modified pursuant to Section 185-6-4; except where the court determines at the hearing that 19the defendant violated a condition of his or her probation 20restricting contact with the victim or other family members or 21commits another offense with the victim or other family 22members, the court shall revoke the defendant's probation and 23impose a term of imprisonment.24    For the purposes of this Section, "family member" and 25"victim" shall have the meanings ascribed to them in Section 2611-0.1 of the Criminal Code of 2012.  HB0074- 14 -LRB104 03324 RLC 13346 b1    (f) (Blank).2    (g) Whenever a defendant is convicted of an offense under 3Sections 11-1.20, 11-1.30, 11-1.40, 11-1.50, 11-1.60, 11-14, 411-14.3, 11-14.4 except for an offense that involves keeping a 5place of juvenile prostitution, 11-15, 11-15.1, 11-16, 11-17, 611-18, 11-18.1, 11-19, 11-19.1, 11-19.2, 12-13, 12-14, 712-14.1, 12-15, or 12-16 of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the 8Criminal Code of 2012, the defendant shall undergo medical 9testing to determine whether the defendant has any sexually 10transmissible disease, including a test for infection with 11human immunodeficiency virus (HIV) or any other identified 12causative agent of acquired immunodeficiency syndrome (AIDS). 13Any such medical test shall be performed only by appropriately 14licensed medical practitioners and may include an analysis of 15any bodily fluids as well as an examination of the defendant's 16person. Except as otherwise provided by law, the results of 17such test shall be kept strictly confidential by all medical 18personnel involved in the testing and must be personally 19delivered in a sealed envelope to the judge of the court in 20which the conviction was entered for the judge's inspection in 21camera. Acting in accordance with the best interests of the 22victim and the public, the judge shall have the discretion to 23determine to whom, if anyone, the results of the testing may be 24revealed. The court shall notify the defendant of the test 25results. The court shall also notify the victim if requested 26by the victim, and if the victim is under the age of 15 and if   HB0074- 15 -LRB104 03324 RLC 13346 b1requested by the victim's parents or legal guardian, the court 2shall notify the victim's parents or legal guardian of the 3test results. The court shall provide information on the 4availability of HIV testing and counseling at Department of 5Public Health facilities to all parties to whom the results of 6the testing are revealed and shall direct the State's Attorney 7to provide the information to the victim when possible. The 8court shall order that the cost of any such test shall be paid 9by the county and may be taxed as costs against the convicted 10defendant.11    (g-5) When an inmate is tested for an airborne 12communicable disease, as determined by the Illinois Department 13of Public Health, including, but not limited to, tuberculosis, 14the results of the test shall be personally delivered by the 15warden or his or her designee in a sealed envelope to the judge 16of the court in which the inmate must appear for the judge's 17inspection in camera if requested by the judge. Acting in 18accordance with the best interests of those in the courtroom, 19the judge shall have the discretion to determine what if any 20precautions need to be taken to prevent transmission of the 21disease in the courtroom.22    (h) Whenever a defendant is convicted of an offense under 23Section 1 or 2 of the Hypodermic Syringes and Needles Act, the 24defendant shall undergo medical testing to determine whether 25the defendant has been exposed to human immunodeficiency virus 26(HIV) or any other identified causative agent of acquired   HB0074- 16 -LRB104 03324 RLC 13346 b1immunodeficiency syndrome (AIDS). Except as otherwise provided 2by law, the results of such test shall be kept strictly 3confidential by all medical personnel involved in the testing 4and must be personally delivered in a sealed envelope to the 5judge of the court in which the conviction was entered for the 6judge's inspection in camera. Acting in accordance with the 7best interests of the public, the judge shall have the 8discretion to determine to whom, if anyone, the results of the 9testing may be revealed. The court shall notify the defendant 10of a positive test showing an infection with the human 11immunodeficiency virus (HIV). The court shall provide 12information on the availability of HIV testing and counseling 13at Department of Public Health facilities to all parties to 14whom the results of the testing are revealed and shall direct 15the State's Attorney to provide the information to the victim 16when possible. The court shall order that the cost of any such 17test shall be paid by the county and may be taxed as costs 18against the convicted defendant.19    (i) All fines and penalties imposed under this Section for 20any violation of Chapters 3, 4, 6, and 11 of the Illinois 21Vehicle Code, or a similar provision of a local ordinance, and 22any violation of the Child Passenger Protection Act, or a 23similar provision of a local ordinance, shall be collected and 24disbursed by the circuit clerk as provided under the Criminal 25and Traffic Assessment Act.26    (j) In cases when prosecution for any violation of Section   HB0074- 17 -LRB104 03324 RLC 13346 b111-1.20, 11-1.30, 11-1.40, 11-1.50, 11-1.60, 11-6, 11-8, 11-9, 211-11, 11-14, 11-14.3, 11-14.4, 11-15, 11-15.1, 11-16, 11-17, 311-17.1, 11-18, 11-18.1, 11-19, 11-19.1, 11-19.2, 11-20.1, 411-20.1B, 11-20.3, 11-21, 11-30, 11-40, 12-13, 12-14, 12-14.1, 512-15, or 12-16 of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal 6Code of 2012, any violation of the Illinois Controlled 7Substances Act, any violation of the Cannabis Control Act, or 8any violation of the Methamphetamine Control and Community 9Protection Act results in conviction, a disposition of court 10supervision, or an order of probation granted under Section 10 11of the Cannabis Control Act, Section 410 of the Illinois 12Controlled Substances Act, or Section 70 of the 13Methamphetamine Control and Community Protection Act of a 14defendant, the court shall determine whether the defendant is 15employed by a facility or center as defined under the Child 16Care Act of 1969, a public or private elementary or secondary 17school, or otherwise works with children under 18 years of age 18on a daily basis. When a defendant is so employed, the court 19shall order the Clerk of the Court to send a copy of the 20judgment of conviction or order of supervision or probation to 21the defendant's employer by certified mail. If the employer of 22the defendant is a school, the Clerk of the Court shall direct 23the mailing of a copy of the judgment of conviction or order of 24supervision or probation to the appropriate regional 25superintendent of schools. The regional superintendent of 26schools shall notify the State Board of Education of any   HB0074- 18 -LRB104 03324 RLC 13346 b1notification under this subsection.2    (j-5) A defendant at least 17 years of age who is convicted 3of a felony and who has not been previously convicted of a 4misdemeanor or felony and who is sentenced to a term of 5imprisonment in the Illinois Department of Corrections shall 6as a condition of his or her sentence be required by the court 7to attend educational courses designed to prepare the 8defendant for a high school diploma and to work toward a high 9school diploma or to work toward passing high school 10equivalency testing or to work toward completing a vocational 11training program offered by the Department of Corrections. If 12a defendant fails to complete the educational training 13required by his or her sentence during the term of 14incarceration, the Prisoner Review Board shall, as a condition 15of mandatory supervised release, require the defendant, at his 16or her own expense, to pursue a course of study toward a high 17school diploma or passage of high school equivalency testing. 18The Prisoner Review Board shall revoke the mandatory 19supervised release of a defendant who wilfully fails to comply 20with this subsection (j-5) upon his or her release from 21confinement in a penal institution while serving a mandatory 22supervised release term; however, the inability of the 23defendant after making a good faith effort to obtain financial 24aid or pay for the educational training shall not be deemed a 25wilful failure to comply. The Prisoner Review Board shall 26recommit the defendant whose mandatory supervised release term   HB0074- 19 -LRB104 03324 RLC 13346 b1has been revoked under this subsection (j-5) as provided in 2Section 3-3-9. This subsection (j-5) does not apply to a 3defendant who has a high school diploma or has successfully 4passed high school equivalency testing. This subsection (j-5) 5does not apply to a defendant who is determined by the court to 6be a person with a developmental disability or otherwise 7mentally incapable of completing the educational or vocational 8program.9    (k) (Blank).10    (l)(A) Except as provided in paragraph (C) of subsection 11(l), whenever a defendant, who is not a citizen or national of 12the United States, is convicted of any felony or misdemeanor 13offense, the court after sentencing the defendant may, upon 14motion of the State's Attorney, hold sentence in abeyance and 15remand the defendant to the custody of the Attorney General of 16the United States or his or her designated agent to be deported 17when:18        (1) a final order of deportation has been issued 19    against the defendant pursuant to proceedings under the 20    Immigration and Nationality Act, and21        (2) the deportation of the defendant would not 22    deprecate the seriousness of the defendant's conduct and 23    would not be inconsistent with the ends of justice.24    Otherwise, the defendant shall be sentenced as provided in 25this Chapter V.26    (B) If the defendant has already been sentenced for a   HB0074- 20 -LRB104 03324 RLC 13346 b1felony or misdemeanor offense, or has been placed on probation 2under Section 10 of the Cannabis Control Act, Section 410 of 3the Illinois Controlled Substances Act, or Section 70 of the 4Methamphetamine Control and Community Protection Act, the 5court may, upon motion of the State's Attorney to suspend the 6sentence imposed, commit the defendant to the custody of the 7Attorney General of the United States or his or her designated 8agent when:9        (1) a final order of deportation has been issued 10    against the defendant pursuant to proceedings under the 11    Immigration and Nationality Act, and12        (2) the deportation of the defendant would not 13    deprecate the seriousness of the defendant's conduct and 14    would not be inconsistent with the ends of justice.15    (C) This subsection (l) does not apply to offenders who 16are subject to the provisions of paragraph (2) of subsection 17(a) of Section 3-6-3.18    (D) Upon motion of the State's Attorney, if a defendant 19sentenced under this Section returns to the jurisdiction of 20the United States, the defendant shall be recommitted to the 21custody of the county from which he or she was sentenced. 22Thereafter, the defendant shall be brought before the 23sentencing court, which may impose any sentence that was 24available under Section 5-5-3 at the time of initial 25sentencing. In addition, the defendant shall not be eligible 26for additional earned sentence credit as provided under   HB0074- 21 -LRB104 03324 RLC 13346 b1Section 3-6-3.2    (m) A person convicted of criminal defacement of property 3under Section 21-1.3 of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the 4Criminal Code of 2012, in which the property damage exceeds 5$300 and the property damaged is a school building, shall be 6ordered to perform community service that may include cleanup, 7removal, or painting over the defacement.8    (n) The court may sentence a person convicted of a 9violation of Section 12-19, 12-21, 16-1.3, or 17-56, or 10subsection (a) or (b) of Section 12-4.4a, of the Criminal Code 11of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012 (i) to an impact 12incarceration program if the person is otherwise eligible for 13that program under Section 5-8-1.1, (ii) to community service, 14or (iii) if the person has a substance use disorder, as defined 15in the Substance Use Disorder Act, to a treatment program 16licensed under that Act.17    (o) Whenever a person is convicted of a sex offense as 18defined in Section 2 of the Sex Offender Registration Act, the 19defendant's driver's license or permit shall be subject to 20renewal on an annual basis in accordance with the provisions 21of license renewal established by the Secretary of State. 22(Source: P.A. 102-168, eff. 7-27-21; 102-531, eff. 1-1-22; 23102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 102-1030, eff. 5-27-22; 103-51, eff. 241-1-24.) 25    (Text of Section after amendment by P.A. 103-825)  HB0074- 22 -LRB104 03324 RLC 13346 b1    Sec. 5-5-3. Disposition. 2    (a) (Blank).3    (b) (Blank). 4    (c)(1) (Blank).5    (2) A period of probation, a term of periodic imprisonment 6or conditional discharge shall not be imposed for the 7following offenses. The court shall sentence the offender to 8not less than the minimum term of imprisonment set forth in 9this Code for the following offenses, and may order a fine or 10restitution or both in conjunction with such term of 11imprisonment:12        (A) First degree murder.13        (B) Attempted first degree murder.14        (C) A Class X felony.15        (D) A violation of Section 401.1 or 407 of the 16    Illinois Controlled Substances Act, or a violation of 17    subdivision (c)(1.5) of Section 401 of that Act which 18    relates to more than 5 grams of a substance containing 19    fentanyl or an analog thereof.20        (D-5) A violation of subdivision (c)(1) of Section 401 21    of the Illinois Controlled Substances Act which relates to 22    3 or more grams of a substance containing heroin or an 23    analog thereof. 24        (E) (Blank).25        (F) A Class 1 or greater felony if the offender had 26    been convicted of a Class 1 or greater felony, including   HB0074- 23 -LRB104 03324 RLC 13346 b1    any state or federal conviction for an offense that 2    contained, at the time it was committed, the same elements 3    as an offense now (the date of the offense committed after 4    the prior Class 1 or greater felony) classified as a Class 5    1 or greater felony, within 10 years of the date on which 6    the offender committed the offense for which he or she is 7    being sentenced, except as otherwise provided in Section 8    40-10 of the Substance Use Disorder Act.9        (F-3) A Class 2 or greater felony sex offense or 10    felony firearm offense if the offender had been convicted 11    of a Class 2 or greater felony, including any state or 12    federal conviction for an offense that contained, at the 13    time it was committed, the same elements as an offense now 14    (the date of the offense committed after the prior Class 2 15    or greater felony) classified as a Class 2 or greater 16    felony, within 10 years of the date on which the offender 17    committed the offense for which he or she is being 18    sentenced, except as otherwise provided in Section 40-10 19    of the Substance Use Disorder Act. 20        (F-5) A violation of Section 24-1, 24-1.1, or 24-1.6 21    of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012 22    for which imprisonment is prescribed in those Sections.23        (G) Residential burglary, except as otherwise provided 24    in Section 40-10 of the Substance Use Disorder Act.25        (H) Criminal sexual assault.26        (I) Aggravated battery of a senior citizen as   HB0074- 24 -LRB104 03324 RLC 13346 b1    described in Section 12-4.6 or subdivision (a)(4) of 2    Section 12-3.05 of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the 3    Criminal Code of 2012.4        (J) A forcible felony if the offense was related to 5    the activities of an organized gang.6        Before July 1, 1994, for the purposes of this 7    paragraph, "organized gang" means an association of 5 or 8    more persons, with an established hierarchy, that 9    encourages members of the association to perpetrate crimes 10    or provides support to the members of the association who 11    do commit crimes.12        Beginning July 1, 1994, for the purposes of this 13    paragraph, "organized gang" has the meaning ascribed to it 14    in Section 10 of the Illinois Streetgang Terrorism Omnibus 15    Prevention Act.16        (K) Vehicular hijacking.17        (L) A second or subsequent conviction for the offense 18    of hate crime when the underlying offense upon which the 19    hate crime is based is felony aggravated assault or felony 20    mob action.21        (M) A second or subsequent conviction for the offense 22    of institutional vandalism if the damage to the property 23    exceeds $300.24        (N) A Class 3 felony violation of paragraph (1) of 25    subsection (a) of Section 2 of the Firearm Owners 26    Identification Card Act.  HB0074- 25 -LRB104 03324 RLC 13346 b1        (O) A violation of Section 12-6.1 or 12-6.5 of the 2    Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012.3        (P) A violation of paragraph (1), (2), (3), (4), (5), 4    or (7) of subsection (a) of Section 11-20.1 of the 5    Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012.6        (P-5) A violation of paragraph (6) of subsection (a) 7    of Section 11-20.1 of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the 8    Criminal Code of 2012 if the victim is a household or 9    family member of the defendant.10        (P-6) A violation of paragraph (2) of subsection (b) 11    of Section 11-20.4 of the Criminal Code of 2012. 12        (Q) A violation of subsection (b) or (b-5) of Section 13    20-1, Section 20-1.2, or Section 20-1.3 of the Criminal 14    Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012.15        (R) A violation of Section 24-3A of the Criminal Code 16    of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012.17        (S) (Blank).18        (T) (Blank).19        (U) A second or subsequent violation of Section 6-303 20    of the Illinois Vehicle Code committed while his or her 21    driver's license, permit, or privilege was revoked because 22    of a violation of Section 9-3 of the Criminal Code of 1961 23    or the Criminal Code of 2012, relating to the offense of 24    reckless homicide, or a similar provision of a law of 25    another state. 26        (V) A violation of paragraph (4) of subsection (c) of   HB0074- 26 -LRB104 03324 RLC 13346 b1    Section 11-20.1B or paragraph (4) of subsection (c) of 2    Section 11-20.3 of the Criminal Code of 1961, or paragraph 3    (6) of subsection (a) of Section 11-20.1 of the Criminal 4    Code of 2012 when the victim is under 13 years of age and 5    the defendant has previously been convicted under the laws 6    of this State or any other state of the offense of child 7    pornography, aggravated child pornography, aggravated 8    criminal sexual abuse, aggravated criminal sexual assault, 9    predatory criminal sexual assault of a child, or any of 10    the offenses formerly known as rape, deviate sexual 11    assault, indecent liberties with a child, or aggravated 12    indecent liberties with a child where the victim was under 13    the age of 18 years or an offense that is substantially 14    equivalent to those offenses.15        (V-5) A violation of paragraph (1) of subsection (b) 16    of Section 11-20.4 of the Criminal Code of 2012 when the 17    victim is under 13 years of age and the defendant has 18    previously been convicted under the laws of this State or 19    any other state of the offense of child pornography, 20    aggravated child pornography, aggravated criminal sexual 21    abuse, aggravated criminal sexual assault, predatory 22    criminal sexual assault of a child, or any of the offenses 23    formerly known as rape, deviate sexual assault, indecent 24    liberties with a child, or aggravated indecent liberties 25    with a child if the victim was under the age of 18 years or 26    an offense that is substantially equivalent to those   HB0074- 27 -LRB104 03324 RLC 13346 b1    offenses. 2        (W) A violation of Section 24-3.5 of the Criminal Code 3    of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012. 4        (X) A violation of subsection (a) of Section 31-1a of 5    the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012.6        (Y) A conviction for unlawful possession of a firearm 7    by a street gang member when the firearm was loaded or 8    contained firearm ammunition. 9        (Z) A Class 1 felony committed while he or she was 10    serving a term of probation or conditional discharge for a 11    felony.12        (AA) Theft of property exceeding $500,000 and not 13    exceeding $1,000,000 in value.14        (BB) Laundering of criminally derived property of a 15    value exceeding $500,000.16        (CC) Knowingly selling, offering for sale, holding for 17    sale, or using 2,000 or more counterfeit items or 18    counterfeit items having a retail value in the aggregate 19    of $500,000 or more. 20        (DD) A conviction for aggravated assault under 21    paragraph (6) of subsection (c) of Section 12-2 of the 22    Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012 if the 23    firearm is aimed toward the person against whom the 24    firearm is being used. 25        (EE) A conviction for a violation of paragraph (2) of 26    subsection (a) of Section 24-3B of the Criminal Code of   HB0074- 28 -LRB104 03324 RLC 13346 b1    2012. 2        (FF) A felony offense that requires registration under 3    the Sex Offender Registration Act. 4    (3) (Blank).5    (4) A minimum term of imprisonment of not less than 10 6consecutive days or 30 days of community service shall be 7imposed for a violation of paragraph (c) of Section 6-303 of 8the Illinois Vehicle Code.9    (4.1) (Blank).10    (4.2) Except as provided in paragraphs (4.3) and (4.8) of 11this subsection (c), a minimum of 100 hours of community 12service shall be imposed for a second violation of Section 136-303 of the Illinois Vehicle Code.14    (4.3) A minimum term of imprisonment of 30 days or 300 15hours of community service, as determined by the court, shall 16be imposed for a second violation of subsection (c) of Section 176-303 of the Illinois Vehicle Code.18    (4.4) Except as provided in paragraphs (4.5), (4.6), and 19(4.9) of this subsection (c), a minimum term of imprisonment 20of 30 days or 300 hours of community service, as determined by 21the court, shall be imposed for a third or subsequent 22violation of Section 6-303 of the Illinois Vehicle Code. The 23court may give credit toward the fulfillment of community 24service hours for participation in activities and treatment as 25determined by court services. 26    (4.5) A minimum term of imprisonment of 30 days shall be   HB0074- 29 -LRB104 03324 RLC 13346 b1imposed for a third violation of subsection (c) of Section 26-303 of the Illinois Vehicle Code.3    (4.6) Except as provided in paragraph (4.10) of this 4subsection (c), a minimum term of imprisonment of 180 days 5shall be imposed for a fourth or subsequent violation of 6subsection (c) of Section 6-303 of the Illinois Vehicle Code.7    (4.7) A minimum term of imprisonment of not less than 30 8consecutive days, or 300 hours of community service, shall be 9imposed for a violation of subsection (a-5) of Section 6-303 10of the Illinois Vehicle Code, as provided in subsection (b-5) 11of that Section. 12    (4.8) A mandatory prison sentence shall be imposed for a 13second violation of subsection (a-5) of Section 6-303 of the 14Illinois Vehicle Code, as provided in subsection (c-5) of that 15Section. The person's driving privileges shall be revoked for 16a period of not less than 5 years from the date of his or her 17release from prison. 18    (4.9) A mandatory prison sentence of not less than 4 and 19not more than 15 years shall be imposed for a third violation 20of subsection (a-5) of Section 6-303 of the Illinois Vehicle 21Code, as provided in subsection (d-2.5) of that Section. The 22person's driving privileges shall be revoked for the remainder 23of his or her life. 24    (4.10) A mandatory prison sentence for a Class 1 felony 25shall be imposed, and the person shall be eligible for an 26extended term sentence, for a fourth or subsequent violation   HB0074- 30 -LRB104 03324 RLC 13346 b1of subsection (a-5) of Section 6-303 of the Illinois Vehicle 2Code, as provided in subsection (d-3.5) of that Section. The 3person's driving privileges shall be revoked for the remainder 4of his or her life. 5    (5) The court may sentence a corporation or unincorporated 6association convicted of any offense to:7        (A) a period of conditional discharge;8        (B) a fine;9        (C) make restitution to the victim under Section 5-5-6 10    of this Code.11    (5.1) In addition to any other penalties imposed, and 12except as provided in paragraph (5.2) or (5.3), a person 13convicted of violating subsection (c) of Section 11-907 of the 14Illinois Vehicle Code shall have his or her driver's license, 15permit, or privileges suspended for at least 90 days but not 16more than one year, if the violation resulted in damage to the 17property of another person.18    (5.2) In addition to any other penalties imposed, and 19except as provided in paragraph (5.3), a person convicted of 20violating subsection (c) of Section 11-907 of the Illinois 21Vehicle Code shall have his or her driver's license, permit, 22or privileges suspended for at least 180 days but not more than 232 years, if the violation resulted in injury to another 24person.25    (5.3) In addition to any other penalties imposed, a person 26convicted of violating subsection (c) of Section 11-907 of the   HB0074- 31 -LRB104 03324 RLC 13346 b1Illinois Vehicle Code shall have his or her driver's license, 2permit, or privileges suspended for 2 years, if the violation 3resulted in the death of another person.4    (5.4) In addition to any other penalties imposed, a person 5convicted of violating Section 3-707 of the Illinois Vehicle 6Code shall have his or her driver's license, permit, or 7privileges suspended for 3 months and until he or she has paid 8a reinstatement fee of $100.9    (5.5) In addition to any other penalties imposed, a person 10convicted of violating Section 3-707 of the Illinois Vehicle 11Code during a period in which his or her driver's license, 12permit, or privileges were suspended for a previous violation 13of that Section shall have his or her driver's license, 14permit, or privileges suspended for an additional 6 months 15after the expiration of the original 3-month suspension and 16until he or she has paid a reinstatement fee of $100. 17    (6) (Blank).18    (7) (Blank).19    (8) (Blank).20    (9) A defendant convicted of a second or subsequent 21offense of ritualized abuse of a child may be sentenced to a 22term of natural life imprisonment.23    (10) (Blank).24    (11) The court shall impose a minimum fine of $1,000 for a 25first offense and $2,000 for a second or subsequent offense 26upon a person convicted of or placed on supervision for   HB0074- 32 -LRB104 03324 RLC 13346 b1battery when the individual harmed was a sports official or 2coach at any level of competition and the act causing harm to 3the sports official or coach occurred within an athletic 4facility or within the immediate vicinity of the athletic 5facility at which the sports official or coach was an active 6participant of the athletic contest held at the athletic 7facility. For the purposes of this paragraph (11), "sports 8official" means a person at an athletic contest who enforces 9the rules of the contest, such as an umpire or referee; 10"athletic facility" means an indoor or outdoor playing field 11or recreational area where sports activities are conducted; 12and "coach" means a person recognized as a coach by the 13sanctioning authority that conducted the sporting event.14    (12) A person may not receive a disposition of court 15supervision for a violation of Section 5-16 of the Boat 16Registration and Safety Act if that person has previously 17received a disposition of court supervision for a violation of 18that Section. 19    (13) A person convicted of or placed on court supervision 20for an assault or aggravated assault when the victim and the 21offender are family or household members as defined in Section 22103 of the Illinois Domestic Violence Act of 1986 or convicted 23of domestic battery or aggravated domestic battery may be 24required to attend a Partner Abuse Intervention Program under 25protocols set forth by the Illinois Department of Human 26Services under such terms and conditions imposed by the court.   HB0074- 33 -LRB104 03324 RLC 13346 b1The costs of such classes shall be paid by the offender. 2    (d) In any case in which a sentence originally imposed is 3vacated, the case shall be remanded to the trial court. The 4trial court shall hold a hearing under Section 5-4-1 of this 5Code which may include evidence of the defendant's life, moral 6character and occupation during the time since the original 7sentence was passed. The trial court shall then impose 8sentence upon the defendant. The trial court may impose any 9sentence which could have been imposed at the original trial 10subject to Section 5-5-4 of this Code. If a sentence is vacated 11on appeal or on collateral attack due to the failure of the 12trier of fact at trial to determine beyond a reasonable doubt 13the existence of a fact (other than a prior conviction) 14necessary to increase the punishment for the offense beyond 15the statutory maximum otherwise applicable, either the 16defendant may be re-sentenced to a term within the range 17otherwise provided or, if the State files notice of its 18intention to again seek the extended sentence, the defendant 19shall be afforded a new trial.20    (e) In cases where prosecution for aggravated criminal 21sexual abuse under Section 11-1.60 or 12-16 of the Criminal 22Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012 results in conviction 23of a defendant who was a family member of the victim at the 24time of the commission of the offense, the court shall 25consider the safety and welfare of the victim and may impose a 26sentence of probation only where:  HB0074- 34 -LRB104 03324 RLC 13346 b1        (1) the court finds (A) or (B) or both are 2    appropriate:3            (A) the defendant is willing to undergo a court 4        approved counseling program for a minimum duration of 5        2 years; or6            (B) the defendant is willing to participate in a 7        court approved plan, including, but not limited to, 8        the defendant's:9                (i) removal from the household;10                (ii) restricted contact with the victim;11                (iii) continued financial support of the 12            family;13                (iv) restitution for harm done to the victim; 14            and15                (v) compliance with any other measures that 16            the court may deem appropriate; and17        (2) the court orders the defendant to pay for the 18    victim's counseling services, to the extent that the court 19    finds, after considering the defendant's income and 20    assets, that the defendant is financially capable of 21    paying for such services, if the victim was under 18 years 22    of age at the time the offense was committed and requires 23    counseling as a result of the offense.24    Probation may be revoked or modified pursuant to Section 255-6-4; except where the court determines at the hearing that 26the defendant violated a condition of his or her probation   HB0074- 35 -LRB104 03324 RLC 13346 b1restricting contact with the victim or other family members or 2commits another offense with the victim or other family 3members, the court shall revoke the defendant's probation and 4impose a term of imprisonment.5    For the purposes of this Section, "family member" and 6"victim" shall have the meanings ascribed to them in Section 711-0.1 of the Criminal Code of 2012.8    (f) (Blank).9    (g) Whenever a defendant is convicted of an offense under 10Sections 11-1.20, 11-1.30, 11-1.40, 11-1.50, 11-1.60, 11-14, 1111-14.3, 11-14.4 except for an offense that involves keeping a 12place of juvenile prostitution, 11-15, 11-15.1, 11-16, 11-17, 1311-18, 11-18.1, 11-19, 11-19.1, 11-19.2, 12-13, 12-14, 1412-14.1, 12-15, or 12-16 of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the 15Criminal Code of 2012, the defendant shall undergo medical 16testing to determine whether the defendant has any sexually 17transmissible disease, including a test for infection with 18human immunodeficiency virus (HIV) or any other identified 19causative agent of acquired immunodeficiency syndrome (AIDS). 20Any such medical test shall be performed only by appropriately 21licensed medical practitioners and may include an analysis of 22any bodily fluids as well as an examination of the defendant's 23person. Except as otherwise provided by law, the results of 24such test shall be kept strictly confidential by all medical 25personnel involved in the testing and must be personally 26delivered in a sealed envelope to the judge of the court in   HB0074- 36 -LRB104 03324 RLC 13346 b1which the conviction was entered for the judge's inspection in 2camera. Acting in accordance with the best interests of the 3victim and the public, the judge shall have the discretion to 4determine to whom, if anyone, the results of the testing may be 5revealed. The court shall notify the defendant of the test 6results. The court shall also notify the victim if requested 7by the victim, and if the victim is under the age of 15 and if 8requested by the victim's parents or legal guardian, the court 9shall notify the victim's parents or legal guardian of the 10test results. The court shall provide information on the 11availability of HIV testing and counseling at Department of 12Public Health facilities to all parties to whom the results of 13the testing are revealed and shall direct the State's Attorney 14to provide the information to the victim when possible. The 15court shall order that the cost of any such test shall be paid 16by the county and may be taxed as costs against the convicted 17defendant.18    (g-5) When an inmate is tested for an airborne 19communicable disease, as determined by the Illinois Department 20of Public Health, including, but not limited to, tuberculosis, 21the results of the test shall be personally delivered by the 22warden or his or her designee in a sealed envelope to the judge 23of the court in which the inmate must appear for the judge's 24inspection in camera if requested by the judge. Acting in 25accordance with the best interests of those in the courtroom, 26the judge shall have the discretion to determine what if any   HB0074- 37 -LRB104 03324 RLC 13346 b1precautions need to be taken to prevent transmission of the 2disease in the courtroom.3    (h) Whenever a defendant is convicted of an offense under 4Section 1 or 2 of the Hypodermic Syringes and Needles Act, the 5defendant shall undergo medical testing to determine whether 6the defendant has been exposed to human immunodeficiency virus 7(HIV) or any other identified causative agent of acquired 8immunodeficiency syndrome (AIDS). Except as otherwise provided 9by law, the results of such test shall be kept strictly 10confidential by all medical personnel involved in the testing 11and must be personally delivered in a sealed envelope to the 12judge of the court in which the conviction was entered for the 13judge's inspection in camera. Acting in accordance with the 14best interests of the public, the judge shall have the 15discretion to determine to whom, if anyone, the results of the 16testing may be revealed. The court shall notify the defendant 17of a positive test showing an infection with the human 18immunodeficiency virus (HIV). The court shall provide 19information on the availability of HIV testing and counseling 20at Department of Public Health facilities to all parties to 21whom the results of the testing are revealed and shall direct 22the State's Attorney to provide the information to the victim 23when possible. The court shall order that the cost of any such 24test shall be paid by the county and may be taxed as costs 25against the convicted defendant.26    (i) All fines and penalties imposed under this Section for   HB0074- 38 -LRB104 03324 RLC 13346 b1any violation of Chapters 3, 4, 6, and 11 of the Illinois 2Vehicle Code, or a similar provision of a local ordinance, and 3any violation of the Child Passenger Protection Act, or a 4similar provision of a local ordinance, shall be collected and 5disbursed by the circuit clerk as provided under the Criminal 6and Traffic Assessment Act.7    (j) In cases when prosecution for any violation of Section 811-1.20, 11-1.30, 11-1.40, 11-1.50, 11-1.60, 11-6, 11-8, 11-9, 911-11, 11-14, 11-14.3, 11-14.4, 11-15, 11-15.1, 11-16, 11-17, 1011-17.1, 11-18, 11-18.1, 11-19, 11-19.1, 11-19.2, 11-20.1, 1111-20.1B, 11-20.3, 11-20.4, 11-21, 11-30, 11-40, 12-13, 12-14, 1212-14.1, 12-15, or 12-16 of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the 13Criminal Code of 2012, any violation of the Illinois 14Controlled Substances Act, any violation of the Cannabis 15Control Act, or any violation of the Methamphetamine Control 16and Community Protection Act results in conviction, a 17disposition of court supervision, or an order of probation 18granted under Section 10 of the Cannabis Control Act, Section 19410 of the Illinois Controlled Substances Act, or Section 70 20of the Methamphetamine Control and Community Protection Act of 21a defendant, the court shall determine whether the defendant 22is employed by a facility or center as defined under the Child 23Care Act of 1969, a public or private elementary or secondary 24school, or otherwise works with children under 18 years of age 25on a daily basis. When a defendant is so employed, the court 26shall order the Clerk of the Court to send a copy of the   HB0074- 39 -LRB104 03324 RLC 13346 b1judgment of conviction or order of supervision or probation to 2the defendant's employer by certified mail. If the employer of 3the defendant is a school, the Clerk of the Court shall direct 4the mailing of a copy of the judgment of conviction or order of 5supervision or probation to the appropriate regional 6superintendent of schools. The regional superintendent of 7schools shall notify the State Board of Education of any 8notification under this subsection.9    (j-5) A defendant at least 17 years of age who is convicted 10of a felony and who has not been previously convicted of a 11misdemeanor or felony and who is sentenced to a term of 12imprisonment in the Illinois Department of Corrections shall 13as a condition of his or her sentence be required by the court 14to attend educational courses designed to prepare the 15defendant for a high school diploma and to work toward a high 16school diploma or to work toward passing high school 17equivalency testing or to work toward completing a vocational 18training program offered by the Department of Corrections. If 19a defendant fails to complete the educational training 20required by his or her sentence during the term of 21incarceration, the Prisoner Review Board shall, as a condition 22of mandatory supervised release, require the defendant, at his 23or her own expense, to pursue a course of study toward a high 24school diploma or passage of high school equivalency testing. 25The Prisoner Review Board shall revoke the mandatory 26supervised release of a defendant who wilfully fails to comply   HB0074- 40 -LRB104 03324 RLC 13346 b1with this subsection (j-5) upon his or her release from 2confinement in a penal institution while serving a mandatory 3supervised release term; however, the inability of the 4defendant after making a good faith effort to obtain financial 5aid or pay for the educational training shall not be deemed a 6wilful failure to comply. The Prisoner Review Board shall 7recommit the defendant whose mandatory supervised release term 8has been revoked under this subsection (j-5) as provided in 9Section 3-3-9. This subsection (j-5) does not apply to a 10defendant who has a high school diploma or has successfully 11passed high school equivalency testing. This subsection (j-5) 12does not apply to a defendant who is determined by the court to 13be a person with a developmental disability or otherwise 14mentally incapable of completing the educational or vocational 15program.16    (k) (Blank).17    (l)(A) Except as provided in paragraph (C) of subsection 18(l), whenever a defendant, who is not a citizen or national of 19the United States, is convicted of any felony or misdemeanor 20offense, the court after sentencing the defendant may, upon 21motion of the State's Attorney, hold sentence in abeyance and 22remand the defendant to the custody of the Attorney General of 23the United States or his or her designated agent to be deported 24when:25        (1) a final order of deportation has been issued 26    against the defendant pursuant to proceedings under the   HB0074- 41 -LRB104 03324 RLC 13346 b1    Immigration and Nationality Act, and2        (2) the deportation of the defendant would not 3    deprecate the seriousness of the defendant's conduct and 4    would not be inconsistent with the ends of justice.5    Otherwise, the defendant shall be sentenced as provided in 6this Chapter V.7    (B) If the defendant has already been sentenced for a 8felony or misdemeanor offense, or has been placed on probation 9under Section 10 of the Cannabis Control Act, Section 410 of 10the Illinois Controlled Substances Act, or Section 70 of the 11Methamphetamine Control and Community Protection Act, the 12court may, upon motion of the State's Attorney to suspend the 13sentence imposed, commit the defendant to the custody of the 14Attorney General of the United States or his or her designated 15agent when:16        (1) a final order of deportation has been issued 17    against the defendant pursuant to proceedings under the 18    Immigration and Nationality Act, and19        (2) the deportation of the defendant would not 20    deprecate the seriousness of the defendant's conduct and 21    would not be inconsistent with the ends of justice.22    (C) This subsection (l) does not apply to offenders who 23are subject to the provisions of paragraph (2) of subsection 24(a) of Section 3-6-3.25    (D) Upon motion of the State's Attorney, if a defendant 26sentenced under this Section returns to the jurisdiction of   HB0074- 42 -LRB104 03324 RLC 13346 b1the United States, the defendant shall be recommitted to the 2custody of the county from which he or she was sentenced. 3Thereafter, the defendant shall be brought before the 4sentencing court, which may impose any sentence that was 5available under Section 5-5-3 at the time of initial 6sentencing. In addition, the defendant shall not be eligible 7for additional earned sentence credit as provided under 8Section 3-6-3.9    (m) A person convicted of criminal defacement of property 10under Section 21-1.3 of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the 11Criminal Code of 2012, in which the property damage exceeds 12$300 and the property damaged is a school building, shall be 13ordered to perform community service that may include cleanup, 14removal, or painting over the defacement.15    (n) The court may sentence a person convicted of a 16violation of Section 12-19, 12-21, 16-1.3, or 17-56, or 17subsection (a) or (b) of Section 12-4.4a, of the Criminal Code 18of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012 (i) to an impact 19incarceration program if the person is otherwise eligible for 20that program under Section 5-8-1.1, (ii) to community service, 21or (iii) if the person has a substance use disorder, as defined 22in the Substance Use Disorder Act, to a treatment program 23licensed under that Act.24    (o) Whenever a person is convicted of a sex offense as 25defined in Section 2 of the Sex Offender Registration Act, the 26defendant's driver's license or permit shall be subject to   HB0074- 43 -LRB104 03324 RLC 13346 b1renewal on an annual basis in accordance with the provisions 2of license renewal established by the Secretary of State. 3(Source: P.A. 102-168, eff. 7-27-21; 102-531, eff. 1-1-22; 4102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 102-1030, eff. 5-27-22; 103-51, eff. 51-1-24; 103-825, eff. 1-1-25.) 6    Section 95. No acceleration or delay. Where this Act makes 7changes in a statute that is represented in this Act by text 8that is not yet or no longer in effect (for example, a Section 9represented by multiple versions), the use of that text does 10not accelerate or delay the taking effect of (i) the changes 11made by this Act or (ii) provisions derived from any other 12Public Act.